Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5511.
people of the state of michigan enact: CHAPTER XI Sec. 1a. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), if the prosecutor of the case agrees after consultation with the victim, a court that is delaying the sentence of a defendant under section 1 of this chapter may, at the court's discretion, delay the entry of the judgment of conviction until sentencing is complete, if either of the following occurs: (a) The court finds good cause to delay the entry of the judgment of conviction on the record. (b) The defendant is accepted into a specialty court or similar program designed to assist with the rehabilitation of the defendant. (2) A defendant is not eligible for a delayed entry or judgment of conviction under subsection (1) for any of the following convictions: (a) A conviction that is eligible for a delayed sentence under sections 11 to 15 of chapter II, section 4a of chapter IX, or section 7411 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7411. (b) A conviction for a traffic offense under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, or a violation of a local ordinance substantially corresponding to that act, that involves the operation of a vehicle and at the time of the violation is a felony or a misdemeanor. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5510 (request no. H06068'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.